Utah statutes.
10-3-1010.   Promotions -- Basis -- Certification of applicants.
The civil service commission shall provide for promotion in the classified
civil service on the basis of ascertained merit, seniority in service and
standing obtained by competitive examination, and shall provide, in all cases
where practicable, that vacancies shall be filled by promotion from the
members of the next lower rank as submit themselves for the examination and
promotion. The civil service commission shall certify to the appointing power
the names of not more than five applicants having the highest rating for each
promotion.
